Illinois, session 104th, HB4982.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Pharmacy Practice Act is amended by adding 5Section 45 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 85/45 new)7    Sec. 45. 9-8-8 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline information. 8    (a) Every licensed pharmacy directly serving patients at a 9physical location shall conspicuously post a sign provided by 10the Department of Human Services that contains the following:11        (1) a statement that a Suicide and Crisis Lifeline is 12    available;13        (2) the 9-8-8 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline number; and14        (3) any other awareness and assistance information the 15    Department of Human Services deems appropriate, including, 16    but not limited to, the National Emergency 9-1-1, the 17    Poison Control helpline, and the 2-1-1 Illinois number.18    The sign required under this Section shall be printed in 19color ink or displayed electronically in color, measure at 20least 8.5 x 11 inches in size, and be posted at either a 21cashier counter or a waiting area that is clearly visible to 22patients.23    Compliance with this Section may be satisfied through   HB4982 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19442 AAS 32890 b1electronic delivery of the notice where the patient has 2consented to electronic communications. 3    (b) Licensed pharmacies that do not maintain a physical 4location that directly serves patients, other than pharmacies 5described under Section 25.5 of this Act, shall include a copy 6of the sign required under this Section with any dispensed 7prescriptions. The sign shall also be available to download on 8the Department of Human Services's website.